District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.14

Classification policy; grade levels; publication required; public hearing.

(a)

For the period beginning October 1, 1980, and ending on the last day of the pay period that contains September 30, 1981, the basic pay for an employee in the Career or Excepted Service shall not exceed $50,112.50 per annum.

(b)

For the period beginning October 1, 1980, and ending on the last day of the pay period that contains September 30, 1981, or until an executive pay plan is established by the Council pursuant to § 1-610.33, the basic pay for an employee in the Executive Service shall not exceed $50,112.50 per annum.

(c)

For the period beginning October 1, 1980, and ending September 30, 1981, the basic pay for an employee of the Board of Education shall not exceed $50,112.50 per annum: Except, that of the Superintendent of Schools, which shall not exceed $55,400.00 per annum.

(d)

For the period beginning October 1, 1980, and ending September 30, 1981, the basic pay for educational employees under the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia whose basic pay as of September 30, 1980, is $50,112.50 per annum or above shall not be increased, nor shall the basic rate of pay of an employee whose basic pay is less than $50,112.50 per annum be paid at a rate in excess of that amount.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1115
as added Mar. 4, 1981, D.C. Law 3-130, § 2(g), 28 DCR 277
Apr. 12, 2000. D.C. Law 13-91, § 104(a), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-612.14.
D.C. Law 13-91, in subsec. (b), substituted “§ 1-611.53” for “§ 1-612.7”.